dev/pronoun/pronoun.bn.dix
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওগুলোকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওগুলো</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তার</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>সে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>একে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তারা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এ</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ও</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এটার</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওটার</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এটায়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এটাতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এতে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওটায়</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এটা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওটা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এটাকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওটাকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওটা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এগুলোর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>এদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ঐগুলোর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ওগুলোর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="infml"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাঁর</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তিনি</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাঁকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাঁদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাঁরা</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাঁদের</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>তাঁদেরকে</l>
          <r>Prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pol"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="তা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="অপরটা__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="নিজে__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="তা"><i>তা</i><par n="তা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="সেটা"><i>সেটা</i><par n="তা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="কিছুই"><i>কিছুই</i><par n="তা__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="নিজে"><i>নিজে</i><par n="নিজে__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="অপরটা"><i>অপরটা</i><par n="অপরটা__prn"/></e>
